Texas statutes.
LABOR CODE

TITLE 2. PROTECTION OF LABORERS

SUBTITLE D. EMPLOYEE BENEFITS

CHAPTER 81. WORK AND FAMILY POLICIES

Sec. 81.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Commission" means the Texas Workforce Commission.

(2) "Work and family policies" means family-related employment policies, including:

(A) hiring and scheduling practices;

(B) employee benefits;

(C) dependent care assistance; and

(D) other terms of employment related to family.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 263 (H.B. 2962), Sec. 2, eff. May 30, 2005.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 846 (H.B. 2975), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 81.003. WORK AND FAMILY POLICIES RESOURCES. The commission shall maintain on its Internet website information and resources for employers who are considering, selecting, or implementing work and family policies, together with an explanation that:

(1) the commission does not and may not provide legal advice; and

(2) an employer is not required by law to implement a work and family policy included on the commission's website.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 846 (H.B. 2975), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 81.0045. DEPENDENT CARE GRANT PROGRAM. (a) The commission may establish a grant program to provide funds to public or private persons to conduct demonstration dependent care projects.

(b) The commission shall adopt rules governing the submission and approval of grant requests and the cancellation of grants.

(c) To receive a grant, a person whose grant is approved must execute an interagency agreement or a contract with the commission. The contract must require the person receiving the grant to perform the services as stated in the approved grant request. The contract must contain appropriate provisions for program and fiscal monitoring.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 305, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 846 (H.B. 2975), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 81.0046. PROMOTION OF WORK AND FAMILY POLICIES. In providing information and resources under this chapter, the commission may encourage employers to implement work and family policies by:

(1) providing examples of work and family policies or providing economic data that demonstrates the economic benefits realized by employers who implement work and family policies, including decreased absenteeism and turnover rates, greater productivity, and federal and state tax incentives;

(2) advertising the availability of federal and state tax incentives for work and family policies; and

(3) sharing other relevant information and resources provided to the commission voluntarily by employers, employees, and other stakeholders.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1038, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 846 (H.B. 2975), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 81.005. SHARING MATERIALS ON WORK AND FAMILY POLICIES. The commission may share materials on work and family policies that are published by state agencies with employers, job applicants, and other interested persons.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 846 (H.B. 2975), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 81.007. RULES. The commission may adopt rules to implement this chapter.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 263 (H.B. 2962), Sec. 3, eff. May 30, 2005.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 846 (H.B. 2975), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 81.008. GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS. (a) The commission may accept a gift or grant from a public or private entity to fund any activity under this chapter.

(b) The commission may accept a donation of money, services, or property only if the commission determines that the donation furthers the lawful purposes and objectives of the commission under this chapter and the donation is accepted in an open meeting by a majority of the voting members of the commission. The donation must be reported in the public records of the commission with the name of the donor and the purpose of the donation. This subsection does not apply to information and resources voluntarily shared with the commission under Section 81.0046.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 846 (H.B. 2975), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.